el: Μέθοδος τοποθέτησης αγκίστρου του ιπτάμενου αντικειμένου: Τοποθέτηση σε βραχίονα; Κουμπωτό με κλιπ; Πρεσαριστό; Με πριτσίνια; Βιδωτό (με σπείρωμα); Βίδα ρύθμισης; Άλλο
fr: Mode de fixation du crochet sur l’épinglier: Montage sur support; À clipser; À emboîtement; Riveté; À visser (fileté); Vis de pression; Autre
tr: Yapay sinek kancası montaj yöntemi: Braket montajlı; Klipsli; Sıkı geçmeli; Perçinli; Vidalı (dişli); Ayar vidalı; Diğer
vi: Phương pháp gắn móc ruồi câu cá: Lắp trên giá đỡ; Dạng kẹp; Lắp ghép áp lực; Tán đinh; Bắt vít (có ren); Vít định vị; Khác
ro-RO: Metoda de montare a cârligului de tip flyer: Montare cu suport; Cu clemă; Prin presare; Nituit; Cu înșurubare (filetat); Șurub de fixare; Altele
ru: Способ крепления крючка нахлысту: На кронштейне; На зажиме; Запрессованные; На заклепках; Ввинчивающиеся (с резьбой); На установочных винтах; Другое
pt-PT: Método de montagem do gancho do folheto: Montagem em suporte; De encaixe; Encaixe por pressão; Rebitado; Aparafusado (com rosca); Parafuso de fixação; Outro
lt-LT: Skrajutės kablio tvirtinimo būdas: Tvirtinama laikikliu; Užsegamas; Įspaudžiamas; Kniedytas; Įsukamas (srieginis); Tvirtinimo varžtas; Kita
fi: Lankaohjaimen kiinnitystapa: Kiinnikeasenteinen; Klipsikiinnitys; Puristussovite; Niitattu; Kierrekiinnitys (kierteinen); Lukkoruuvi; Muu
sv: Monteringsmetod för flyer-krok: Monterad med fäste; Klämfäste; Presspassning; Nitad; Inskruvad (gängad); Ställskruv; Övrigt
sl-SI: Način pritrditve kljuke za letake: Pritrjeno z nosilcem; Z zatičem; Na pritisk; Kovičeno; Privito (z navojem); Nastavitveni vijak; Drugo
de: Befestigungsart des Flyerhakens: Auf Halterung montiert; Aufsteckbar; Eingepresst; Vernietet; Einschraubbar (Gewinde); Stellschraube; Sonstiges
cs: Způsob montáže háku na vřeteno: Montáž na držák; Nacvakávací; Nalisované; Nýtované; Šroubovací (závit); Zajišťovací šroub; Ostatní
ko: 플라이어 후크 장착 방식: 브래킷 장착형; 클립온; 압입형; 리벳형; 스크류인(스레드형); 세트 스크류; 기타
bg-BG: Метод за монтаж на кука за папка: Монтаж на скоба; С клипс; С пресована сглобка; С нит; Навиващи се (с резба); Със застопоряващ винт; Друг
nb: Monteringsmetode for flyerkrok: Brakettmontert; Klipsmontert; Pressmontert; Naglefestet; Skrus inn (gjenget); Settskrue; Annet
ja: フライヤーフックの取り付け方法: ブラケットマウント; クリップオン; 圧入; リベット留め; ねじ込み式 (スレッド); 止めねじ; その他
it: Metodo di montaggio del gancio per volantino: A staffa; A clip; A pressione; Rivettato; Avvitabile (filettato); Vite di fermo; Altro
pt-BR: Método de montagem do gancho na asa: Montado em suporte; De encaixe (clip-on); Encaixe por pressão; Rebitado; Rosqueado; Parafuso de fixação; Outro
hu: Szárnyaskamó rögzítési módja: Konzolos; Felpattintható; Sajtolt illesztésű; Szegecselt; Becsavarható (menetes); Hernyócsavaros; Egyéb
hr-HR: Metoda montaže kuke za letke: Montaža na nosač; Na kopču; Utično; Zakovano; Uvrtno (s navojem); Pritezni vijak; Ostalo
en: Flyer hook mounting method: Bracket-mounted; Clip-on; Press-fit; Riveted; Screw-in (threaded); Set-screw; Other
nl: Vluchthaak bevestigingsmethode: Op beugel gemonteerd; Opklembaar; Perspassing; Geklonken; Inschroefbaar (met schroefdraad); Stelschroef; Overige
zh-CN: 飞蝇钓钩座安装方式: 支架安装; 夹扣式; 压配式; 铆接式; 旋入式（螺纹）; 固定螺钉式; 其他
sk-SK: Spôsob uchytenia háčika na krídlovom nadstavci: Montáž pomocou konzoly; Nacvakávacie; Nalisované; Nitované; Zaskrutkované (so závitom); Zaisťovacia skrutka; Iné
da: Monteringsmetode for flyer-krog: Monteret med beslag; Clip-on; Trykmonteret; Nittet; Skrues i (med gevind); Pinolskrue; Andet
zh-TW: 飛翼鉤安裝方式: 支架安裝; 夾式; 壓合式; 鉚接; 旋入式 (螺紋); 固定螺絲; 其他
es: Método de montaje del gancho del folleto: Montaje en soporte; Enganchable; Ajuste a presión; Remachado; Atornillado (roscado); Tornillo de fijación; Otro
th: วิธีการติดตั้งขอเกี่ยวฟลายเออร์: ติดตั้งด้วยโครงยึด; หนีบติด; สวมอัด; ย้ำหมุด; ขันสกรู (มีเกลียว); สกรูตัวหนอน; อื่นๆ
pl: Metoda mocowania haczyka skrzydełka: Na wsporniku; Na klips; Wciskany; Nitowany; Wkręcany (gwintowany); Na śrubę dociskową; Inny